Nebraska, session 109, LB94.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB94 LB94
2025 2025
Section 1. Sections 1 to 7 of this act shall be known and may be
cited as the Digital Skills Empowerment Act.
Sec. 2. (1) The Legislature finds that:
(a) Digital skills are essential in the modern workforce, and
technology-related fields often offer higher wages and job security;
(b) Communities in qualified census tracts in Nebraska, particularly
in areas like North Omaha, face barriers to accessing digital education
and training due to economic, infrastructural, and educational
disparities;
(c) Equipping residents of such communities with digital skills will
increase employment opportunities, reduce income inequality, and
stimulate local economies; and
(d) Equipping residents returning from prison from such communities
with digital skills will increase employment opportunities, reduce income
inequality, stimulate local economies, and reduce recidivism in local
jails and penal institutions.
(2) The purpose of the Digital Skills Empowerment Act is to:
(a) Provide accessible, affordable digital skills training and
certification for residents of qualified census tracts in Nebraska;
(b) Foster community-based digital apprenticeship programs;
(c) Increase employment in digital trades for communities in
qualified census tracts across Nebraska; and
(d) Develop sustainable, ongoing support systems for workforce
development and career progression in technology-related fields.
Sec. 3. For purposes of the Digital Skills Empowerment Act:
(1) Local educational institution means a community center, a
community college, a school as defined in section 79-101, or a vocational
institution;
(2) Low-income individual means an individual with a household
income between one hundred and two hundred percent of the federal poverty
level; and
-2-

LB94 LB94
2025 2025
(3) Qualified census tract means a qualified census tract as defined
in 26 U.S.C. 42(d)(5)(B)(ii)(I), as such section existed on January 1,
2025.
Sec. 4. (1) The Department of Labor, in collaboration with the
Department of Economic Development, shall:
(a) Establish a grant program to provide grants to local educational
institutions within qualified census tracts and nonprofits to develop and
operate digital skills training centers which are to be located within
qualified census tracts to provide access to digital skills training to
individuals that may lead to digital skills certification. The total
amount of grant funds awarded pursuant to this subdivision shall not
exceed twenty million dollars per fiscal year; and
(b) Establish a grant program to provide grants to cover tuition,
learning materials, transportation, necessary equipment, and child care
for low-income individuals to access a digital skills training center and
receive training leading to a digital skills certification. The total
amount of grant funds awarded pursuant to this subdivision shall not
exceed twenty million dollars per fiscal year.
(2)(a) A local educational institution or nonprofit may apply to the
Department of Labor for a grant pursuant to subdivision (1)(a) of this
section in a manner prescribed by the department and shall include with
such application:
(i) The name of the applicant and a contact person for such
application;
(ii) Information regarding the applicant's qualification as a local
educational institution or nonprofit;
(iii) The planned location of the digital skills training center;
(iv) The type of digital skills training, courses, and certification
to be available at such center;
(v) The amount of funding requested, how such funding is to be used,
and, if applicable, how such funding use may help individuals returning
-3-

LB94 LB94
2025 2025
to such community from jail or prison; and
(vi) Any other information the department may require.
(b) If the funds available for grants in any year are insufficient
to provide grants to all eligible applicants described in subdivision (2)
(a) of this subsection, the department shall establish priorities to
award such grants.
(3)(a) An individual may apply to the Department of Labor for a
grant pursuant to subdivision (1)(b) of this section in a manner
prescribed by the department and shall include with such application:
(i) The name of the applicant;
(ii) Information regarding the applicant's status as a low-income
individual;
(iii) The digital skills training center the individual plans to
attend;
(iv) The amount of funding requested, how such funding is to be
used, and, if applicable, how such funding use may help individuals
returning to such community from jail or prison; and
(v) Any other information the department may require.
(b) If the funds available for grants in any year are insufficient
to provide grants to all eligible applicants described in subdivision (3)
(a) of this subsection, the department shall establish priorities to
award such grants.
Sec. 5. (1) The Department of Labor, in collaboration with the
Department of Economic Development, with input from the technology
industry, shall develop standardized, industry-aligned curricula for use
in digital skills training centers that include:
(a) Core digital skills; and
(b)(i) Special tracks for certain skills that include, but are not
limited to, web development, cloud computing, and digital marketing; and
(ii) Fast-track bootcamp programs to teach specialized skills in a
short timeframe. Digital skills training centers shall provide both
-4-

LB94 LB94
2025 2025
virtual and in-person options of fast-track bootcamp programs to better
accommodate participants.
(2) The Department of Economic Development shall encourage
partnerships with Nebraska-based technology firms and national technology
companies to:
(a) Provide input on curricula design;
(b) Offer guest lectures, mentorship, and hands-on training
opportunities at digital skills training centers; and
(c) Facilitate access to industry-standard tools and software at
digital skills training centers.
Sec. 6. (1) The Department of Labor shall establish a grant program
to provide grants to technology companies or businesses in Nebraska to
establish paid apprenticeships in digital trades.
(2) An apprenticeship provided pursuant to this section shall offer
direct, hands-on experience in a technology related role such as a junior
developer, data analyst, or cybersecurity assistant. Such apprenticeship
program shall include assisting an apprentice with developing a resume,
preparing for interviews, and connecting with technology employers.
(3)(a) A technology company or business may apply to the department
in a manner prescribed by the department for a grant to hire a paid
apprentice or apprentices in a technology related role. The total amount
of grant funds awarded pursuant to this subsection shall not exceed ten
million dollars per fiscal year. Such application shall include:
(i) The name of the company or business and a contact person;
(ii) Information regarding the qualification as a technology company
or business;
(iii) The location of the apprenticeship program;
(iv) The type of apprenticeship that shall be available as part of
the grant;
(v) The amount of funding requested, how such funding is to be used,
and, if applicable, how such funding may help individuals returning to
-5-

LB94 LB94
2025 2025
such community from jail or prison; and
(vi) Any other information the department may require.
(b) If the funds available for grants provided pursuant to this
section in any year are insufficient to provide grants to all eligible
applicants, the department shall establish priorities to award such
grants.
(4) The Department of Labor shall:
(a) Partner with technology companies and businesses receiving a
grant pursuant to this section to help apprentices progress from entry-
level positions to mid-level and senior-level positions within such
company or business or in the technology industry;
(b) Partner with employers in Nebraska in the technology field to
provide information to individuals interested in the technology industry
related to job fairs, networking events, and apprenticeships; and
(c) Develop a network of contacts to provide apprentices and others
interested in the technology industry with job opportunities, promotion
guidance, and continued training resources.
Sec. 7. It is the intent of the Legislature to appropriate fifty
million dollars from the Workforce Development Program Cash Fund to the
Department of Labor for fiscal year 2025-26 and each fiscal year
thereafter to provide grants pursuant to the Digital Skills Empowerment
Act.
Sec. 8. Section 81-407, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-407 The Workforce Development Program Cash Fund is hereby
created. The fund shall consist of transfers authorized by the
Legislature. The Department of Labor shall administer the fund to provide
workforce development grants and grants pursuant to the Digital Skills
Empowerment Act. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be
invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital
Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
-6-

LB94 LB94
2025 2025
Sec. 9. This act becomes operative on January 1, 2026.
Sec. 10. Original section 81-407, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is repealed.
-7-